tr_test.dic
şutlamak/ѝ
şorlamak/ѝ
kumlamak/ѝ
ulamak/ѝ
budamak/ѝ
cicozlamak/ѝ
limonlamak/ѝ
mazotlamak/ѝ
onamak/ѝ
bozlamak/ѝ
bodoslamak/ѝ
somutlamak/ѝ
oflamak/ѝ
fokurdamak/ѝ
koklamak/ѝ
burgulamak/ѝ
kokozlamak/ѝ
oyumlamak/ѝ
tutamak/ѝ
balyozlamak/ѝ
oylumlamak/ѝ
gucurdamak/ѝ
çokramak/ѝ
gurklamak/ѝ
rujlamak/ѝ
pusulamak/ѝ
yudumlamak/ѝ
buğulamak/ѝ
kutulamak/ѝ
susamak/ѝ
hamurlamak/ѝ
tapulamak/ѝ
soğumak/ѝ
tuşlamak/ѝ
yurtsamak/ѝ
tonlamak/ѝ
topuklamak/ѝ
kurulamak/ѝ
nodullamak/ѝ
vakumlamak/ѝ
ulumak/ѝ
soluklamak/ѝ
macunlamak/ѝ
pullamak/ѝ
guruldamak/ѝ
boşamak/ѝ
yağmurlamak/ѝ
korumak/ѝ
porsumak/ѝ
uyumak/ѝ
koçsamak/ѝ
sonlamak/ѝ
coplamak/ѝ
yollamak/ѝ
puflamak/ѝ
kotlamak/ѝ
tohumlamak/ѝ
afyonlamak/ѝ
otlamak/ѝ
tokurdamak/ѝ
horuldamak/ѝ
toslamak/ѝ
boğumlamak/ѝ
sabunlamak/ѝ
çoğullamak/ѝ
kılavuzlamak/ѝ
sorumak/ѝ
klonlamak/ѝ
uğuldamak/ѝ
depolamak/ѝ
turlamak/ѝ
uflamak/ѝ
mumlamak/ѝ
sifonlamak/ѝ
boklamak/ѝ
kollamak/ѝ
uçuklamak/ѝ
pohpohlamak/ѝ
çamurlamak/ѝ
ispiyonlamak/ѝ
konumlamak/ѝ
pofurdamak/ѝ
tunçlamak/ѝ
yumak/ѝ
yumuşamak/ѝ
çakozlamak/ѝ
fosurdamak/ѝ
tamponlamak/ѝ
dolamak/ѝ
sabuklamak/ѝ
sorgulamak/ѝ
oylamak/ѝ
bumlamak/ѝ
uyuklamak/ѝ
çoksamak/ѝ
boynuzlamak/ѝ
bulgulamak/ѝ
yoklamak/ѝ
kurgulamak/ѝ
burunlamak/ѝ
muştulamak/ѝ
lodoslamak/ѝ
zorlamak/ѝ
vurgulamak/ѝ
loğlamak/ѝ
ohlamak/ѝ
yavuklamak/ѝ
donamak/ѝ
ebrulamak/ѝ
uğursamak/ѝ
silolamak/ѝ
çapullamak/ѝ
oyulgamak/ѝ
okşamak/ѝ
yorumlamak/ѝ
palamutlamak/ѝ
kuzulamak/ѝ
kutlamak/ѝ
çubuklamak/ѝ
azotlamak/ѝ
tomruklamak/ѝ
klorlamak/ѝ
avuçlamak/ѝ
kartonlamak/ѝ
umursamak/ѝ
sollamak/ѝ
kutlulamak/ѝ
raporlamak/ѝ
çomak/ѝ
avurtlamak/ѝ
kulunlamak/ѝ
bulamak/ѝ
doğramak/ѝ
tuzlamak/ѝ
kocamak/ѝ
kalburlamak/ѝ
boyamak/ѝ
ocumak/ѝ
yokumsamak/ѝ
yuvgulamak/ѝ
aforozlamak/ѝ
foslamak/ѝ
tozumak/ѝ
kutsamak/ѝ
boylamak/ѝ
uzamak/ѝ
sulamak/ѝ
abuklamak/ѝ
akozlamak/ѝ
baryumlamak/ѝ
boyutlamak/ѝ
buhurlamak/ѝ
buzulamak/ѝ
iyotlamak/ѝ
komak/ѝ
kovumsamak/ѝ
parpullamak/ѝ
repolamak/ѝ
toylamak/ѝ
yoksunsamak/ѝ
yoşumak/ѝ
zumlamak/ѝ
çocuklamak/ѝ
affolma/ѝ
alıkonma/ѝ
alıkoyma/ѝ
avundurma/ѝ
avunulma/ѝ
avutulma/ѝ
açadurma/ѝ
banadura/ѝ
başvurma/ѝ
bekleyedurma/ѝ
bozdurma/ѝ
bozdurulma/ѝ
bozulma/ѝ
bozunma/ѝ
bozuşturma/ѝ
boğdurtma/ѝ
boğma/ѝ
boğuşma/ѝ
buldurma/ѝ
bulma/ѝ
bulundurulma/ѝ
buluşma/ѝ
buluşturulma/ѝ
buna/ѝ
burdurulma/ѝ
burkulma/ѝ
buruşma/ѝ
buruşturulma/ѝ
buyma/ѝ
buyurma/ѝ
coşturma/ѝ
defolma/ѝ
devrolunma/ѝ
dokundurtma/ѝ
dokunulma/ѝ
doldurma/ѝ
doldurulma/ѝ
dolukma/ѝ
dondurulma/ѝ
doyma/ѝ
doyurma/ѝ
doğdurma/ѝ
doğrultma/ѝ
doğurma/ѝ
durdurma/ѝ
durdurulma/ѝ
durulma/ѝ
duyma/ѝ
duyurma/ѝ
duyurulma/ѝ
eşkoşma/ѝ
gadrolunma/ѝ
gidedurma/ѝ
gocunma/ѝ
hallolunma/ѝ
hasrolunma/ѝ
hükmolunma/ѝ
kavrulma/ѝ
kavuşma/ѝ
kavuşulma/ѝ
kaydolma/ѝ
kokutma/ѝ
kokuşma/ѝ
kondurma/ѝ
konma/ѝ
konuşma/ѝ
konuşturma/ѝ
konuşulma/ѝ
korkma/ѝ
korkutma/ѝ
korunma/ѝ
korutma/ѝ
kovdurtma/ѝ
kovulma/ѝ
kovuşturulma/ѝ
koydurtma/ѝ
koyulma/ѝ
koçma/ѝ
koşma/ѝ
koşturtma/ѝ
koşulma/ѝ
koşuşturma/ѝ
kudurtma/ѝ
kurdurtma/ѝ
kurtulma/ѝ
kurulma/ѝ
kurutulma/ѝ
kusturma/ѝ
lağvolma/ѝ
mahvolma/ѝ
nakşolma/ѝ
neşrolunma/ѝ
okra/ѝ
okunulma/ѝ
okutturma/ѝ
ola/ѝ
oldu/ѝ
oldurtma/ѝ
olunma/ѝ
oluşturma/ѝ
oluşturulma/ѝ
ondurma/ѝ
onulma/ѝ
osurtma/ѝ
oturtma/ѝ
oturtulma/ѝ
oturuşlu/ѝ
ovdurtma/ѝ
ovulma/ѝ
ovuşturma/ѝ
oyma/ѝ
porsuma/ѝ
pusma/ѝ
reddolunma/ѝ
savrulma/ѝ
savundurma/ѝ
savurma/ѝ
savuşma/ѝ
sokma/ѝ
sokturtma/ѝ
sokturulma/ѝ
sokuşma/ѝ
soldurma/ѝ
soldurulma/ѝ
solunma/ѝ
somurma/ѝ
somurulma/ѝ
sordurtma/ѝ
sorulma/ѝ
sorutma/ѝ
soruşturma/ѝ
soydurma/ѝ
soyma/ѝ
soyundurma/ѝ
soyundurtulma/ѝ
soyunma/ѝ
soğulma/ѝ
soğurma/ѝ
soğutulma/ѝ
sundurtma/ѝ
sundurulma/ѝ
sunulma/ѝ
susturma/ѝ
susturtulma/ѝ
susulma/ѝ
tokuşma/ѝ
tokuşulma/ѝ
topla/ѝ
tozutma/ѝ
tutturma/ѝ
tutundurma/ѝ
tutuşma/ѝ
tutuşulma/ѝ
ulutma/ѝ
umma/ѝ
unutma/ѝ
unutturulma/ѝ
usavurma/ѝ
utulma/ѝ
uyma/ѝ
uyuma/ѝ
uyutma/ѝ
uyuşma/ѝ
uyuşturulma/ѝ
uçurtma/ѝ
uçuşma/ѝ
uğunma/ѝ
vurdurma/ѝ
vurdurulma/ѝ
vurulma/ѝ
vuruşturma/ѝ
yamulma/ѝ
yapadurma/ѝ
yoksunma/ѝ
yoldurtma/ѝ
yoluna/ѝ
yonma/ѝ
yontulma/ѝ
yordurma/ѝ
yorma/ѝ
yorulma/ѝ
yoğurma/ѝ
yoğuşma/ѝ
yumdurma/ѝ
yumrulma/ѝ
yunma/ѝ
yutma/ѝ
yutturulma/ѝ
zannolunma/ѝ
zikrolunma/ѝ
övünedurma/ѝ
vazolamak/ѝ
kargolamak/ѝ
